Florida, session 2026, SB1480.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 14 458.315, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 15 458.315âTemporary certificate for practice in areas of 16 critical need.â 17 (3)âThe board may issue a temporary certificate under this 18 section subject to the following restrictions: 19 (c)1.âAny certificate issued under this section is valid 20 only so long as one of the following conditions applies: 21 a.âThe State Surgeon General determines that the reason for 22 which it was issued remains a critical need to the state. 23 b.âThe certificateholder has an active primary care 24 treatment relationship, established no later than January 1, 25 2026, with one or more patients in an area that was determined 26 to be an area of critical need under paragraph (a) when the 27 certificate was issued but that subsequently lost such 28 designation. In such case, at the discretion of the board, a 29 certificateholder may continue treating such patients in that 30 area under the certificate if all other requirements of this 31 section are satisfied. 32 2.âThe board shall review each temporary certificateholder 33 at least annually to ascertain that the certificateholder is 34 complying with the minimum requirements of the Medical Practice 35 Act and its adopted rules, as applicable to the 36 certificateholder. If it is determined that the 37 certificateholder is not meeting such minimum requirements, the 38 board must revoke such certificate or impose restrictions or 39 conditions, or both, as a condition of continued practice under 40 the certificate. 41 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 42 459.0076, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 43 459.0076âTemporary certificate for practice in areas of 44 critical need.â 45 (3)âThe board may issue this temporary certificate subject 46 to the following restrictions: 47 (c)1.âAny certificate issued under this section is valid 48 only so long as one of the following conditions applies: 49 a.âThe State Surgeon General determines that the reason for 50 which it was issued remains a critical need to the state. 51 b.âThe certificateholder has an active primary care 52 treatment relationship, established no later than January 1, 53 2026, with one or more patients in an area that was determined 54 to be an area of critical need under paragraph (a) when the 55 certificate was issued but that subsequently lost such 56 designation. In such case, at the discretion of the board, a 57 certificateholder may continue treating such patients in that 58 area under the certificate if all other requirements of this 59 section are satisfied. 60 2.âThe board shall review each temporary certificateholder 61 at least annually to ascertain that the certificateholder is 62 complying with the minimum requirements of the Osteopathic 63 Medical Practice Act and its adopted rules, as applicable to the 64 certificateholder. If it is determined that the 65 certificateholder is not meeting such minimum requirements, the 66 board must revoke such certificate or impose restrictions or 67 conditions, or both, as a condition of continued practice under 68 the certificate. 69 Section 3.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 70 464.0121, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 71 464.0121âTemporary certificate for practice in areas of 72 critical need.â 73 (3)âThe board may issue a temporary certificate under this 74 section subject to the following restrictions: 75 (c)1.âAny certificate issued under this section is valid 76 only so long as one of the following conditions applies: 77 a.âThe State Surgeon General maintains the determination 78 that the critical need that supported the issuance of the 79 temporary certificate remains a critical need to the state. 80 b.âThe certificateholder has an active primary care 81 treatment relationship, established no later than January 1, 82 2026, with one or more patients in an area that was determined 83 to be an area of critical need under paragraph (a) when the 84 certificate was issued but that subsequently lost such 85 designation. In such case, at the discretion of the board, a 86 certificateholder may continue treating such patients in that 87 area under the certificate if all other requirements of this 88 section are satisfied. 89 2.âThe board shall review each temporary certificateholder 90 at least annually to ascertain that the certificateholder is 91 complying with the minimum requirements of the Nurse Practice 92 Act and its adopted rules, as applicable to the 93 certificateholder. If it is determined that the 94 certificateholder is not meeting such minimum requirements, the 95 board must revoke such certificate or impose restrictions or 96 conditions, or both, as a condition of continued practice under 97 the certificate. 98 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.